Colorado, session 2026A, HB1129.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-3.2-108, amend
(3)(c)(I)(B), (10)(a), and (11); and add (2)(q.5), (3)(g), (4)(i), (5)(c),
(5)(d), (5)(e), and (12) as follows:
40-3.2-108. Clean heat targets - legislative declaration -
exclusion of residential sector - revised clean heat plans - system
safety and integrity projects - definitions - plans - rules - reports.
(2) Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(q.5) "SYSTEM SAFETY AND INTEGRITY PROJECT" MEANS A
PROJECT CONDUCTED BY A GAS DISTRIBUTION UTILITY THAT IMPROVES OR
UPGRADES THE SAFETY OR INTEGRITY OF THE GAS DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM,
INCLUDING:
(I) PIPELINE AND STORAGE INTEGRITY MANAGEMENT PROGRAMS;
(II) EXPOSED PIPE INSPECTION AND REMEDIATION;
(III) PIPE OR COMPRESSOR STATION UPGRADES;
(IV) PROJECTS UNDERTAKEN TO MEET THE UNITED STATES
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION PIPELINE AND HAZARDOUS MATERIALS
SAFETY ADMINISTRATION REQUIREMENTS; AND
(V) SUPERVISORY CONTROL AND DATA ACQUISITION UPGRADES.
-2- HB26-1129

(3) Clean heat targets.
(c) (I) In calculating the baseline and projected emissions covered
under a clean heat plan, a gas distribution utility must include the
following:
(B) Carbon dioxide emissions resulting from the combustion of
gas by residential, commercial and industrial customers not otherwise
subject to federal greenhouse gas emission reporting and excluding all
transport customers; and
(g) (I) A GAS DISTRIBUTION UTILITY SHALL NOT INCLUDE CARBON
DIOXIDE EMISSIONS RESULTING FROM THE COMBUSTION OF GAS BY
RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS AS PART OF THE GAS DISTRIBUTION UTILITY'S
CLEAN HEAT PLAN.
(II) A GAS DISTRIBUTION UTILITY SHALL EXCLUDE CARBON
DIOXIDE EMISSIONS RESULTING FROM THE COMBUSTION OF GAS BY
RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS IN CALCULATING THE UTILITY'S BASELINE AND
PROJECTED EMISSIONS COVERED UNDER A CLEAN HEAT PLAN.
(4) Submission of clean heat plans - revised clean heat plans.
(i) (I) A GAS DISTRIBUTION UTILITY THAT HAS SUBMITTED A CLEAN
HEAT PLAN PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF
THIS SUBSECTION (4)(i) THAT RELIES ON A CALCULATION OF BASELINE AND
PROJECTED EMISSIONS THAT INCLUDES CARBON DIOXIDE EMISSIONS
RESULTING FROM THE COMBUSTION OF GAS BY RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS
MAY REVISE ITS CLEAN HEAT PLAN WITH CALCULATIONS THAT EXCLUDE
CARBON DIOXIDE EMISSIONS RESULTING FROM THE COMBUSTION OF GAS
BY RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS.
(II) A GAS DISTRIBUTION UTILITY THAT SUBMITS A REVISED CLEAN
HEAT PLAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION (4)(i) MUST SUBMIT
-3- HB26-1129

ITS REVISED PLAN ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, OR WITHIN TWO
YEARS AFTER THE UTILITY SUBMITS ITS ORIGINAL CLEAN HEAT PLAN,
WHICHEVER DATE IS LATER.
(III) IF A GAS DISTRIBUTION UTILITY HAS NOT SUBMITTED A CLEAN
HEAT PLAN ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, THE GAS DISTRIBUTION
UTILITY SHALL SUBMIT ITS INITIAL CLEAN HEAT PLAN AND EXCLUDE
CARBON DIOXIDE EMISSIONS RESULTING FROM THE COMBUSTION OF GAS
BY RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS IN ITS CALCULATION OF BASELINE AND
PROJECTED EMISSIONS.
(IV) A GAS DISTRIBUTION UTILITY SHALL EXCLUDE CARBON
DIOXIDE EMISSIONS RESULTING FROM THE COMBUSTION OF GAS BY
RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS IN ITS CALCULATION OF BASELINE AND
PROJECTED EMISSIONS FOR ANY SUBSEQUENT CLEAN HEAT PLANS OR
UPDATES TO CLEAN HEAT PLANS THAT MAY BE REQUIRED PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION.
(5) Commission rules.
(c) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL
ADOPT RULES THAT ALLOW A GAS DISTRIBUTION UTILITY TO SUBMIT A
REVISED CLEAN HEAT PLAN THAT EXCLUDES CARBON DIOXIDE EMISSIONS
RESULTING FROM THE COMBUSTION OF GAS BY RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS
IN THE UTILITY'S CALCULATION OF BASELINE AND PROJECTED EMISSIONS
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(d) THE COMMISSION SHALL NOT ADOPT ANY RULE THAT
PROHIBITS, OR EFFECTIVELY PROHIBITS, A GAS DISTRIBUTION UTILITY
FROM INSTALLING, MAINTAINING, OR UPGRADING GAS UTILITY
INFRASTRUCTURE SERVICE TO A RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY.
(e) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT ANY RULES NECESSARY FOR A
-4- HB26-1129

GAS DISTRIBUTION UTILITY TO RECOVER SYSTEM SAFETY AND INTEGRITY
PROJECT COSTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (12) OF THIS SECTION.
(10) No later than December 1, 2025, the commission, in
consultation with the division, shall determine mass-based greenhouse
gas emission reduction targets for clean heat plans for 2035. In
establishing these targets, the commission shall:
(a) Ensure that gas distribution utilities' greenhouse gas emissions
will be in line with the residential, commercial and industrial sectors'
contribution to statewide greenhouse gas pollution; and
(11) No later than December 1, 2032, the commission, in
consultation with the division, shall determine the mass-based greenhouse
gas emission reduction goals for clean heat plans for 2040, 2045, and
2050 using a 2015 baseline that, at minimum, ensure that gas distribution
utilities' greenhouse gas emission reductions will be proportionate to the
residential, commercial and industrial sectors' contribution to the
greenhouse gas emission reduction goals, excluding transportation gas
service customers or customers that report their own greenhouse gas
emissions to the federal environmental protection agency under
applicable federal law, including 40 CFR 98, subpart NN. In determining
these goals, the commission shall consider savings achieved or projected
to be achieved in other sectors of the state's economy, as well as the
commercial availability of technologies to achieve emission reductions
in this sector.
(12) System safety and integrity projects - cost recovery.
(a) A GAS DISTRIBUTION UTILITY THAT IS REGULATED BY THE
COMMISSION SHALL BE PERMITTED TO RECOVER ALL PROJECTED SYSTEM
SAFETY AND INTEGRITY PROJECT COSTS ANNUALLY.
-5- HB26-1129

(b) THE COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE THE RECOVERY OF
PROJECTED SYSTEM SAFETY AND INTEGRITY PROJECT COSTS THROUGH AN
ANNUAL RATE ADJUSTMENT CLAUSE OR A SEPARATE RATE ADJUSTMENT
CLAUSE, INCLUDING A RETURN BASED ON THE GAS DISTRIBUTION UTILITY'S
MOST RECENTLY APPROVED WEIGHTED AVERAGE COST OF CAPITAL THAT
IS EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1 OF EACH YEAR.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-3.2-104.3, repeal
(1)(d) and (2)(a) as follows:
40-3.2-104.3. Options for high-efficiency electric heating -
exemptions - definitions.
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(d) "Line extension allowance" means a bundle of costs that
includes construction allowances for new service lines, meters, and other
infrastructure associated with the addition of a new customer to a gas
utility's distribution system.
(2) (a) A gas utility shall not provide an applicant an incentive,
including a line extension allowance, to establish gas service to a
property.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
-6- HB26-1129

November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-7- HB26-1129